District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.03

License required.

(a)

A person shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance in the District for any class of insurance unless the person is licensed for that line of authority in accordance with this chapter. The license itself shall not create any authority in the licensee to represent or commit an insurance carrier.

(b)

(1)

A person who maintains his or her principal place of residence and principal place of business in the District shall apply for a resident insurance producer license.

(2)

A person who maintains his or her principal place of residence and principal place of business outside the District shall apply for a nonresident insurance producer license.

(3)

A person who maintains either, but not both, his or her principal place of residence or principal place of business in the District shall apply for:

(A)

A nonresident insurance producer license if the person is licensed as a resident insurance producer in another state; or

(B)

A resident insurance producer license if the person is not licensed as a resident insurance producer in another state.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 3, 50 DCR 260
May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-155, § 2(b), 55 DCR 3683
D.C. Law 17-155 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).